New Jersey, session 222, S2384.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the Surrogate of every county is authorized to establish electronic systems to accept electronic signatures on qualifying documents.  As used in this act, qualifying documents include application for probate, authorization to accept service of process, executor qualification, surety bond, data entry review, renunciation of executor, application for administration, qualification of administrator, renunciation of administrator, affidavit of assets, notice of probate, and similar qualifying documents.  This act shall not apply to any will. 2.    The Supreme Court may adopt Rules of Court and the Administrative Director of the Courts may issue directives to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.